Utah statutes.
26-5-1.   "Chronic disease" defined.
As used in this chapter, "chronic disease" means an impairment or deviation
from the normal functioning of the human body having one or more of the
following characteristics:
(1)  It is permanent;
(2)  It leaves residual disability;
(3)  It is caused by nonreversible pathological alterations;
(4)  It requires special patient education and instruction for rehabilitation;
(5)  It may require a long period of supervision, observation and care.
